Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 1, chapter 661, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  The amounts authorized,  as provided by ORS 286A.035, for issuance of general obligation
bonds of the state during the 2019-2021 biennium, notwithstanding  section 9, chapter 570, Oregon
Laws 2017, are as follows:
GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS
General Fund Obligations
(1) Higher Education Coordinating
Commission (Art. XI-G):
[(a) Blue Mountain Community ]
[College, Facility for ]
[Agricultural Resource ]
[Management.................................. $ 6,615,000]
[(b)] (a) Central Oregon Community
College, Classroom Building
Redmond Campus ......................... $ 8,125,000
[(c)] (b) Clatsop Community College,
Maritime Science Building ........ $ 8,120,000
[(d)] (c) Klamath Community College,
Apprenticeship [ and Industrial ]
[Trades] Center ............................. $ 3,965,000
[(e)] (d) Lane Community College,
Health Care Village Facility ..... $ 8,125,000
[(f) Mt. Hood Community College, ]
[Maywood Park Center ................ $ 8,125,000]
[(g)] (e) Oregon Coast Community
College, Workforce Education
and Resiliency Center ................. $ 8,125,000
Enrolled Senate Bill 5721 (SB 5721-INTRO) Page 1
[(h)] (f) Portland Community College,
Health Technology Building
Renovation ..................................... $ 8,125,000
[(i)] (g) Southwestern Oregon
Community College,
Sumner and Coaledo Halls
Remodel ..........................................$ 2,800,000
[(j)] (h) Treasure Valley Community
College, Nursing-Allied
Health Professions Center ......... $ 5,015,000
[(k) Umpqua Community College, ]
[Industrial Technology ]
[Building.........................................$ 8,125,000]
(i) Oregon Institute of
Technology, Boivin Hall
Rehabilitation........................ $ 1,055,000
(j) Oregon State University,
Arts and Education Complex $ 35,455,000
(k) Portland State University,
SB1 Renovation and
Expansion.............................. $ 7,620,000
(L) University of Oregon,
Huestis Hall Renovation ....... $ 6,475,000
(2) Oregon Business Development
Department (Art. XI-M) .............. $ 101,240,000
(3) Oregon Business Development
Department (Art. XI-N) ............... $ 20,270,000
(4) Department of Education
(Art. XI-P) ......................................$ 126,090,000
(5) Oregon Department of
Administrative
Services (Art. XI-Q):
(a) State Fair Horse Barn ................ $ 3,050,000
(b) State Fair Poultry Barn ............. $ 2,045,000
(c) State Fair Facilities
Capital Improvement ................... $ 5,430,000
(d) Department of Corrections:
(A) Capital Improvement and
Renewal ..........................................$ 24,810,000
(B) Radio System ................................. $ 14,235,000
(C) Camera System ............................. $ 8,790,000
(e) Department of Human
Services, ONE Integrated
Eligibility and Medicaid
Eligibility System ......................... $ 38,165,000
(f) Housing and Community
Services Department:
(A) Local Innovation and Fast
[Track Housing Program ............ $ 151,550,000]
Track Housing Program ....... $ 201,865,000
(B) Permanent Supportive
Housing...........................................$ 50,730,000
Enrolled Senate Bill 5721 (SB 5721-INTRO) Page 2
(g) Higher Education
Coordinating Commission:
(A) Public Universities Capital
Improvement and Renewal ......... $ 65,715,000
(B) Oregon Institute of
Technology[ ,]:
(i) OMIC R&D Rapid
Toolmaking Center, Rapid
Prototyping Education Lab
and Sinter HIP Equipment ......... $ 12,905,000
(ii) Boivin Hall Rehabilitation..... $ 18,560,000
(C) Portland State University,
SB1 Renovation and
Expansion.............................. $ 53,135,000
(D) University of Oregon:
(i) Huestis Hall Renovation ....... $ 51,505,000
(ii) ShakeAlert ............................ $ 7,620,000
(h) Oregon Military Department:
(A) Salem and Pendleton
Aviation Facility Emergency
Enhancement ................................. $ 9,985,000
(B) Portland Jackson Armory
Service Life Extension ................ $ 4,335,000
(C) Salem Owen Summers and
Anderson Readiness Center
Service Life Extension ................ $ 5,910,000
(D) Oregon Military Museum ........... $ 2,045,000
(i) Oregon Youth Authority:
(A) Oak Creek Medical and
Dental Renovations ..................... $ 1,345,000
(B) Tillamook Medical and
Dental Renovations ..................... $ 1,595,000
(C) MacLaren Infirmary and
Pharmacy Renovation and
Expansion .......................................$ 1,875,000
(D) MacLaren West Cottages
Renovation ..................................... $ 14,325,000
(E) Rogue Valley Facility
Improvements ................................ $ 8,135,000
(F) Control Room Renovations ........ $ 1,850,000
(G) Capital Improvements ................. $ 5,305,000
(j) State Forestry Department,
Toledo Facility Replacement ..... $ 1,249,223
(k) Department of
Environmental Quality,
Environmental Data
Management System .................... $ 5,065,000
(L) Legislative Administration
Committee[,]:
(i) Document
Publishing and
Management System .................... $ 9,280,000
Enrolled Senate Bill 5721 (SB 5721-INTRO) Page 3
(ii) Capitol Accessibility,
Maintenance and Safety ........ $ 68,960,000
(m) Judicial Department:
(A) Clackamas County
Courthouse ..................................... $ 31,935,000
[(B) Lane County Courthouse ............. $ 88,455,000]
[(C) Linn County Courthouse ............. $ 16,180,000]
[(D)] (B) Multnomah County
Courthouse ..................................... $ 8,625,000
[(E)] (C) Supreme Court
Building Renovation .................... $ 28,230,000
(n) Oregon Business Development
Department, City of Salem
Drinking Water
Improvements ....................... $ 20,305,000
Dedicated Fund Obligations
(6) Department of Veterans’
Affairs (Art. XI-A) ........................ $ 180,000,000
(7) Department of Environmental
Quality (Art. XI-H) ....................... $ 10,000,000
(8) Housing and Community
Services Department
(Art. XI-I(2)) ................................... $ 50,000,000
(9) Oregon Department of
Administrative Services
(Art. XI-Q):
(a) Revenue Building Electrical
System Upgrades .......................... $ 10,240,000
(b) Justice Building
Exterior Renovations .................. $ 5,105,000
(c) Portland State Office
Building Improvements ............... $ 8,725,000
(d) Wilsonville Building
Purchase .........................................$ 24,330,000
(e) State Forestry Department,
Toledo Facility Replacement ..... $ 1,735,777
Total General Obligation
[Bonds .............................................$ 1,236,150,000]
Bonds ....................................  $ 1,429,655,000
SECTION 2.  Section 2, chapter 661, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  The amounts  authorized, as provided by ORS 286A.035, for issuance of revenue bonds
of the state during the 2019-2021 biennium are as follows:
REVENUE BONDS
Direct Revenue Bonds
Housing and Community
Services Department ................... $ 500,000,000
Department of
Transportation .............................. $ 485,000,000
Oregon Business Development
Department .................................... $ 100,000,000
Oregon Department of
Enrolled Senate Bill 5721 (SB 5721-INTRO) Page 4
Administrative Services,
[Lottery Revenue Bonds .............. $ 302,505,000]
Lottery Revenue Bonds ........ $ 247,075,000
Total Direct Revenue
[Bonds .............................................$ 1,387,505,000]
Bonds ....................................  $ 1,332,075,000
Pass-Through Revenue Bonds
Oregon Business Development
Department, Industrial
Development Bonds ..................... $ 600,000,000
Oregon Business Development
Department, Beginning and
Expanding Farmer Loan
Program ..........................................$ 5,000,000
Oregon Facilities Authority ...... $ 1,000,000,000
Housing and Community
[Services Department .................... $ 600,000,000]
Services Department ............. $ 900,000,000
Total Pass-Through Revenue
[Bonds .............................................$ 2,205,000,000]
Bonds ....................................  $ 2,505,000,000
[Total Revenue Bonds .................. $ 3,592,505,000]
Total Revenue Bonds ............ $ 3,837,075,000
SECTION 3. Section 7, chapter 661, Oregon Laws 2019, is repealed.
SECTION 4.  Section 8, chapter 661, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 8.  (1) Out of the amount specified in section  1 (5)(m)(A) [ of this 2019 Act ], chapter 661,
Oregon Laws 2019, the State Treasurer  may issue Article XI-Q bonds in an amount not to exceed
$31,500,000 of net proceeds for the purposes and in the manner specified in section 8, chapter 705,
Oregon Laws 2013, plus an amount estimated by the  State Treasurer to pay estimated bond-related
costs.
[(2) Out of the amount specified in section 1 (5)(m)(B) of this 2019 Act, the  State Treasurer may
issue Article XI-Q bonds in an amount not to exceed $87,600,000 of net proceeds for the  purposes and
in the manner specified in section 8, chapter 705, Oregon Laws 2013, plus an amount estimated  by the
State Treasurer to pay estimated bond-related costs. ]
[(3) Out of the amount specified in section 1 (5)(m)(C) of this 2019 Act, the State Treasurer  may
issue Article XI-Q bonds in an amount not to exceed $15,900,000 of net proceeds for the  purposes and
in the manner specified in section 8, chapter 705, Oregon Laws 2013, plus an amount estimated  by the
State Treasurer to pay estimated bond-related costs. ]
[(4)] (2)  For purposes of sections 8  and 9, chapter 705, Oregon Laws 2013, and section 64,
chapter 723, Oregon Laws 2013, bonds issued pursuant to this section are considered to be  bonds
issued pursuant to section 8, chapter 705, Oregon Laws 2013.
[(5)] (3)  Bonds may not be issued pursuant to section  1 (5)(m)(A)[ , (B) or (C) of this 2019 Act ],
chapter 661, Oregon Laws 2019,  except as provided in this section.
SECTION 5.
Section 14, chapter 671, Oregon Laws 2019, is repealed.
SECTION 6. Section 16, chapter 671, Oregon Laws 2019, is repealed.
SECTION 7. Section 21, chapter 671, Oregon Laws 2019, is repealed.
SECTION 8. Section 23, chapter 671, Oregon Laws 2019, is repealed.
SECTION 9.  Section 24, chapter 671, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 24.  (1) For the biennium beginning July  1, 2019, at the request of the Oregon Department
of Administrative Services, after the department consults with the  YMCA of Columbia-Willamette,
the State Treasurer is authorized  to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in
an amount that produces [ $5] $2.5 million in net proceeds for the purposes  described in subsection
Enrolled Senate Bill 5721 (SB 5721-INTRO) Page 5
(2) of this section, plus an additional  amount estimated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to
pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net  proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the depart-
ment for deposit in the  ODAS Economic Development Distributions Fund established under ORS
461.553 for distribution to  the YMCA of Columbia-Willamette to purchase the Beaverton Hoop
YMCA property, which encompasses approximately five acres and two buildings. The  project also
includes repurposing the second building to accommodate addition of a Child  Development Center
and YMCA office space.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond  proceeds will create jobs, further
economic development, finance public education or restore  and protect parks, beaches, watersheds
and native fish and wildlife, and  is authorized based on the finding that improving access to sports
and recreation services will enhance the economic viability of the region, create jobs and improve
the quality of life for the community.
SECTION 10.
Section 28, chapter 671, Oregon Laws 2019, is repealed.
SECTION 11. Section 29, chapter 671, Oregon Laws 2019, is repealed.
SECTION 12. Section 30, chapter 671, Oregon Laws 2019, is repealed.
SECTION 13.  Section 28, chapter  748, Oregon Laws 2017, as amended by section 32, chapter
671, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 28.  (1) The OBDD Economic Development  Distributions Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned on the moneys in the OBDD
Economic  Development  Distributions Fund must be credited to the fund. The OBDD Economic De-
velopment Distributions Fund  consists of moneys deposited in the fund under sections 26 and 27,
chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, and sections 27  [to] and 31 [ of this 2019 Act ], chapter 671, Oregon
Laws 2019, and  may include fees, revenues or other income deposited into the fund by the Legisla-
tive Assembly.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to  the Oregon Business Development De-
partment for purposes described in sections  26 and 27, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, and sections
27 [to] and 31 [ of this 2019 Act ], chapter 671, Oregon Laws 2019 .
SECTION 14.
Section 38, chapter 671, Oregon Laws 2019, is repealed.
SECTION 15. (1) A public university that is carrying out a qualified project shall require
each contractor in a contract with an estimated cost of $200,000 or greater to:
(a) Employ apprentices to perform 15 percent of the  work hours that workers in
apprenticeable occupations perform under the contract, in a manner  consistent with the
apprentices’ respective apprenticeship training programs;
(b) Establish and execute a plan for outreach, recruitment and retention of  women, mi-
nority individuals and veterans to perform work under the contract, with the  aspirational
target of having at least 15 percent of total  work hours performed by individuals in one or
more of those groups;
(c) Provide health insurance and retirement benefits to workers; and
(d) Require any subcontractor engaged by the contractor  to abide by the requirements
set forth in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of this subsection, if the work  to be performed under
the subcontract has an estimated cost of $200,000 or greater.
(2) On  or before February 1 of each year, each public university that is carrying out a
qualified project shall report to the Joint Committee on Ways and Means or  Joint Interim
Committee on Ways and Means, as part of the report required under ORS 350.379, on:
(a) The amount of work performed on qualified projects by apprentices;
(b) The amount  of work performed on qualified projects by women, minority individuals
and veterans; and
(c) The types and costs of health insurance and retirement benefits  provided to workers
by contractors and subcontractors.
(3) The requirements of this section are  in addition to, and not in lieu of, the require-
ments imposed under ORS 350.379.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5721 (SB 5721-INTRO) Page 6
(4) As used in this section:
(a) “Apprentice” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.010.
(b) “Apprenticeable occupation” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.010.
(c) “Apprenticeship training program”  means the total system of apprenticeship that a
particular local joint committee, as defined in ORS 660.010, operates, including the local joint
committee’s registered standards  and all other terms and conditions for qualifying, recruit-
ing, selecting, employing and training apprentices in an apprenticeable occupation.
(d) “Minority individual” has the meaning given that term in ORS 200.005.
(e) “Qualified project” means the following capital construction projects:
(A) The Oregon Institute  of Technology Boivin Hall Rehabilitation referenced in section
1 (1)(i), chapter 661, Oregon Laws 2019;
(B) The Oregon State University Arts  and Education Complex project referenced in sec-
tion 1 (1)(j), chapter 661, Oregon Laws 2019;
(C) The Portland  State University SB1 Renovation and Expansion referenced in section
1 (1)(k), chapter 661, Oregon Laws 2019; and
(D) The University of Oregon  Huestis Hall Renovation referenced in section 1 (1)(L),
chapter 661, Oregon Laws 2019.
(f) “Veteran” has the meaning given that term in ORS 408.225.
(g) “Woman” has the meaning given that term in ORS 200.005.
SECTION 16.
This 2020 second special session Act being necessary  for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to  exist, and
this 2020 second special session Act takes effect on its passage.
Passed by Senate August 10, 2020
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House August 10, 2020
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2020
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2020
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2020
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5721 (SB 5721-INTRO) Page 7